Washington statutes.
RCW 42.04.040

Proceedings to impeach, etc., preserved.

The omission to specify or affirm in *this act any ground of forfeiture of a public office or other trust or special authority conferred by law, or any power conferred by law to impeach, remove, depose or suspend any public officer or other person holding any trust, appointment or other special authority conferred by law, shall not affect such forfeiture or power, or any proceeding authorized by law to carry into effect such impeachment, removal, deposition or suspension.

[ 1909 c 249 s 45; RRS s 2297.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "this act" relates to the criminal code of 1909. For disposition of sections, see note following RCW 9.01.120.

Forfeiture of office for conviction of felony or malfeasance: RCW 9.92.120.

Impeachment and removal: State Constitution Art. 5.

Recall of elective officers: State Constitution Art. 1 s 33 (Amendment 8); chapter 29A.56 RCW.